Utah statutes.
16-10a-721.   Voting entitlement of shares.
(1)  Except as otherwise provided in Subsections (2) and (4), in Section
61-6-10, or in the articles of incorporation, each outstanding share,
regardless of class, is entitled to one vote, and each fractional share is
entitled to a corresponding fractional vote, on each matter voted on at a
shareholders' meeting.  Only shares are entitled to vote.
(2)  Except as otherwise ordered by a court of competent jurisdiction upon a
finding that the purpose of this subsection would not be violated in the
circumstances presented to the court, the shares of a corporation are not
entitled to be voted or to be counted in determining the total number of
outstanding shares eligible to be voted if they are owned, directly or
indirectly, by a second corporation, domestic or foreign, and the first
corporation owns, directly or indirectly, a majority of the shares entitled to
vote for directors of the second corporation.
(3)  Subsection (2) does not limit the power of a corporation to vote any
shares, including its own shares, held by it in a fiduciary capacity.
(4)  Redeemable shares are not entitled to be voted after notice of redemption
is mailed to the holders and a sum sufficient to redeem the shares has been
deposited with a bank, trust company, or other financial institution under an
irrevocable obligation to pay the holders the redemption price on surrender of
the shares.
